California, session 20252026, AB1189.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8019.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:8019.5. It shall be an unfair labor practice for a California court to terminate a certified shorthand reporter who is employed by a court and shifting their job duties to a digital reporter or legal transcriptionist. There shall be a presumption that terminating a certified shorthand reporter within ____ days before or after hiring a digital reporter or legal transcriptionist is a violation of this section.SEC. 2. Section 8031 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:8031. The amount of the fees required by this chapter is that fixed by the board in accordance with the following schedule:(a) The fee for filing an application for each examination shall be no more than forty dollars ($40).(b) The fee for examination and reexamination for each of the written or practical parts of the examination shall be in an amount fixed by the board, which shall be equal to the actual cost of preparing, administering, grading, and analyzing the examination, but shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) for each separate part, for each administration.(c) The initial certificate fee is an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the certificate is issued, except that, if the certificate will expire less than 180 days after its issuance, then the fee is 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the certificate is issued, or fifty dollars ($50), whichever is greater. The board may, by appropriate regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of the initial certificate fee where the certificate is issued less than 45 days before the date on which it will expire.(d) By a resolution adopted by the board, a renewal fee may be established in such amounts and at such times as the board may deem appropriate to meet its operational expenses and funding responsibilities as set forth in this chapter. The renewal fee shall not be more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor less than ten dollars ($10) annually, with the following exception:Any person who is employed full time by the State of California as a hearing reporter and who does not otherwise render shorthand reporting services for a fee shall be exempt from licensure while in state employment and shall not be subject to the renewal fee provisions of this subdivision until 30 days after leaving state employment. The renewal fee shall, in addition to the amount fixed by this subdivision, include any unpaid fees required by this section plus any delinquency fee.(e) The duplicate certificate fee shall be no greater than ten dollars ($10).(f) The penalty for failure to notify the board of a change of name or address as required by Section 8024.6 shall be no greater than fifty dollars ($50).(g) The fees for initial certification and renewal as a digital reporter pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8060) or for certification as a legal transcriptionist pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 8070) shall be established by the board by regulation. Those fees shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory cost to the board to administer and enforce those provisions.SEC. 3. Article 6 (commencing with Section 8060) is added to Chapter 13 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: Article 6. Digital Reporter8060. (a) Any person over 18 years of age who meets the following requirements shall qualify for certification as a digital reporter:(1) Has not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480, 8025, or 8025.1.(2) Has a high school education or its equivalent, as determined by the board.(3) Holds a valid license as a notary public in California.(4) Meets either of the following:(A) Has a certificate from the American Association of Electronic Reporters and Transcribers as a certified electronic reporter or certified deposition reporter demonstrating proficiency with the equipment and protocols to capture a digital record of the proceeding or deposition.(B) Has a valid license to digitally record proceedings issued by a state other than California whose requirements and licensing examination are substantially the same as those in California.(b) A person may apply to the board for certification as a digital reporter in the manner specified by the board and upon payment of any fees required pursuant to Section 8031.(c) A certificate issued pursuant to this article shall be valid for a period of one year, except the initial period of licensure as prescribed by the board, and shall expire at 12 midnight on the last day of the month of birth of the licensee unless renewed.8061. A certificate issued pursuant to this article shall be renewed in the manner specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 8020).8062. A certified digital reporter is authorized to do all of the following:(a) Swear in witnesses.(b) Ensure that the digital recording equipment is properly functioning and capturing the record accurately.(c) Alert participants when malfunctions occur.(d) Ensure the chain of custody of the record.(e) Capture the record in a legal proceeding, including depositions, hearings, and trials.SEC. 4. Article 7 (commencing with Section 8070) is added to Chapter 13 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: Article 7. Legal Transcriptionist8070. (a) Any person over 18 years of age, who has not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for the denial of licensure under Sections 480, 8025, and 8025.1, who has a high school education or its equivalent as determined by the board, or has a certificate from the American Association of Electronic Reporters and Transcribers or its equivalent, as determined by the board, shall be entitled to a certificate as a legal transcriptionist.(b) A person may apply to the board for certification as a legal transcriptionist in the manner specified by the board and upon payment of any fees required pursuant to Section 8031.(c) The board shall issue a certificate within 60 days of receipt of a complete and accurate application from an applicant who has met the criteria specified in subdivision (a). The certificate shall be valid for one year, except the initial period of licensure, which shall be prescribed by the board. The license shall expire at midnight on the last day of the month of birth of the licensee, unless renewed.(d) A certificate holder shall renew a certificate in the manner specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 8020).8072. A legal transcriptionist is authorized to do all of the following:(a) Transcribe audio and video recordings of depositions, trials, and appeals proceedings. (b) Review transcriptions for accuracy and clarity.(c) Certify transcripts for use in legal proceedings.SEC. 5. Section 2025.330 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:2025.330. (a) The deposition officer shall put the deponent under oath or affirmation.(b) Unless the parties agree or the court orders otherwise, the testimony, as well as any stated objections, shall be taken stenographically. If taken stenographically, it shall be recorded stenographically by a person certified pursuant to under Article 3 (commencing with Section 8020) or Article 6 (commencing with Section 8060) of Chapter 13 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.(c) The party noticing the deposition may also record the testimony by audio or video technology if the notice of deposition stated an intention also to record the testimony by either of those methods, or if all the parties agree that the testimony may also be recorded by either of those methods. Any other party, at that party’s expense, may make an audio or video record of the deposition, provided that the other party promptly, and in no event less than three calendar days before the date for which the deposition is scheduled, serves a written notice of this intention to make an audio or video record of the deposition testimony on the party or attorney who noticed the deposition, on all other parties or attorneys on whom the deposition notice was served under Section 2025.240, and on any deponent whose attendance is being compelled by a deposition subpoena under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2020.010). If this notice is given three calendar days before the deposition date, it shall be made by personal service under Section 1011.(d) Examination and cross-examination of the deponent shall proceed as permitted at trial under the provisions of the Evidence Code.(e) In lieu of participating in the oral examination, parties may transmit written questions in a sealed envelope to the party taking the deposition for delivery to the deposition officer, who shall unseal the envelope and propound them to the deponent after the oral examination has been completed.(f) For the purposes of this chapter, a deposition is recorded stenographically when it is recorded by either of the following:(1) A person certified pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 8020) of Chapter 13 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.(2) A digital reporter certified pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8060) of Chapter 13 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.SEC. 6. Section 2025.510 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:2025.510. (a) Unless the parties agree otherwise, the testimony at a deposition recorded by stenographic means shall be transcribed.(b) The party noticing the deposition shall bear the cost of the transcription, unless the court, on motion and for good cause shown, orders that the cost be borne or shared by another party.(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2025.320, any other party or the deponent, at the expense of that party or deponent, may obtain a copy of the transcript.(d) If the deposition officer receives a request from a party for an original or a copy of the deposition transcript, or any portion thereof, and the full or partial transcript will be available to that party prior to the time the original or copy would be available to any other party, the deposition officer shall immediately notify all other parties attending the deposition of the request, and shall, upon request by any party other than the party making the original request, make that copy of the full or partial deposition transcript available to all parties at the same time.(e) Stenographic notes and stenographic recordings of depositions shall be retained by the reporter for a period of not less than eight years from the date of the deposition, where no transcript is produced, and not less than one year from the date on which the transcript is produced. The notes may be either on paper or electronic media, as long as it allows for satisfactory production of a transcript at any time during the periods specified.(f) At the request of any other party to the action, including a party who did not attend the taking of the deposition testimony, any party who records or causes the recording of that testimony by means of audio or video technology shall promptly do both of the following:(1) Permit that other party to hear the audio recording or to view the video recording.(2) Furnish a copy of the audio or video recording to that other party on receipt of payment of the reasonable cost of making that copy of the recording.(g) If the testimony at the deposition is recorded both stenographically and by audio or video technology, the stenographic transcript, including a transcript of a recording prepared consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 2025.330, shall be the official record of that testimony for the purpose of the trial and any subsequent hearing or appeal.(h) (1) The requesting attorney or party appearing in propria persona shall timely pay the deposition officer or the entity providing the services of the deposition officer for the transcription or copy of the transcription described in subdivision (b) or (c), and any other deposition product or service that is requested either orally or in writing.(2) This subdivision shall apply unless responsibility for the payment is otherwise provided by law or unless the deposition officer or entity is notified in writing at the time the services or products are requested that the party or another identified person will be responsible for payment.(3) This subdivision does not prohibit or supersede an agreement between an attorney and a party allocating responsibility for the payment of deposition costs to the party.(4) Nothing in the case of Serrano v. Stefan Merli Plastering Co., Inc. (2008) 162 Cal.App.4th 1014 shall be construed to alter the standards by which a court acquires personal jurisdiction over a nonparty to an action.(5) The requesting attorney or party appearing in propria persona, upon the written request of a deposition officer who has obtained a final judgment for payment of services provided pursuant to this subdivision, shall provide to the deposition officer an address that can be used to effectuate service for the purpose of Section 708.110 in the manner specified in Section 415.10.(i) For purposes of this section, “deposition product or service” means any product or service provided in connection with a deposition that qualifies as shorthand reporting, as described in Section 8017 of the Business and Professions Code, and any product or service derived from that shorthand reporting.SEC. 7. Section 1295 is added to the Evidence Code, to read:1295. If otherwise admissible, a digitally captured transcript is admissible if the transcript meets both of the following criteria:(a) It was captured digitally under the supervision of a digital reporter certified pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8060) of Chapter 13 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.(b) It was transcribed by a digital reporter certified pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8060) of Chapter 13 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or by a legal transcriptionist certified pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 8070) of Chapter 13 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.SEC. 8. Section 69954.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:69954.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a digital reporter may prepare an electronic recording of a proceeding in accordance with the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 8060) of Chapter 13 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code. If an electronic recording is prepared by a digital reporter, a legal transcriptionist, as defined in Article 7 (commencing with Section 8070) of Chapter 13 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, may prepare a transcript of the proceeding.(b) A legal transcriptionist shall receive for their services the fees prescribed in this article.SEC. 9. Section 69957 of the Government Code is amended to read:69957. (a) (1) If an official reporter or an official reporter pro tempore is unavailable to report an action or proceeding in a court, subject to the availability of approved equipment and equipment monitors, the court may order that, in a limited civil case, or a misdemeanor or infraction case, the action or proceeding be electronically recorded by a certified digital reporter.(2) The electronic recording shall include all the testimony, the objections made, the ruling of the court, the exceptions taken, all arraignments, pleas, and sentences of defendants in criminal cases, the arguments of the attorneys to the jury, and all statements and remarks made and oral instructions given by the judge.(a)If an official reporter or an official reporter pro tempore is unavailable to report an action or proceeding in a court, subject to the availability of approved equipment and equipment monitors, the court may order that, in a limited civil case, or a misdemeanor or infraction case, the action or proceeding be electronically recorded, including all the testimony, the objections made, the ruling of the court, the exceptions taken, all arraignments, pleas, and sentences of defendants in criminal cases, the arguments of the attorneys to the jury, and all statements and remarks made and oral instructions given by the judge. A(3) A transcript derived from an electronic recording may be utilized whenever when a transcript of a court proceedings proceeding is required. required and when the transcript was transcribed by a certified legal transcriptionist. Transcripts derived from electronic recordings shall include a designation of “inaudible” or “unintelligible” for those portions of the recording that contain no audible sound or are not discernible. The electronic recording device and appurtenant equipment shall be of a type approved by the Judicial Council for courtroom use and shall only be purchased for use as provided by this section. A court shall not expend funds for or use electronic recording technology or equipment to make an unofficial record of an action or proceeding, including for purposes of judicial notetaking, or to make the official record of an action or proceeding in circumstances not authorized by this section.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a court may use electronic recording equipment for the internal personnel purpose of monitoring the performance of subordinate judicial officers, as defined in Section 71601 of the Government Code, hearing officers, and temporary judges while proceedings are conducted in the courtroom, if notice is provided to the subordinate judicial officer, hearing officer, or temporary judge, and to the litigants, that the proceeding may be recorded for that purpose. An electronic recording made for the purpose of monitoring that performance shall not be used for any other purpose and shall not be made publicly available. Any recording made pursuant to this subdivision shall be destroyed two years after the date of the proceeding unless a personnel matter is pending relating to performance of the subordinate judicial officer, hearing officer, or temporary judge.(c) Prior to Before purchasing or leasing any electronic recording technology or equipment, a court shall obtain advance approval from the Judicial Council, which may grant that approval only if the use of the technology or equipment will be consistent with this section.SEC. 10. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 8009 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:8009.Disciplinary proceedings under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.